Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 3. Applicability.

Sec. 40.15.190.
[Renumbered as AS 40.15.290.]

Sec. 40.15.200.
Application to state and political subdivisions.

All subdivisions of land made by the state, its agencies, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions are subject to the provisions of AS

40.15.010

—

40.15.200

and AS

29.40.070

—

29.40.160

, or home rule ordinances or regulations governing subdivisions, and shall comply with ordinances and other local regulations adopted under AS

40.15.010

—

40.15.200

and AS

29.40.070

—

29.40.160

or former AS 29.33.150 — 29.33.240, or under home rule authority, in the same manner and to the same extent as subdivisions made by other landowners.

History.

(§ 2 ch 89 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 118 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1974; am § 65 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Opinions of attorney general. —

State-owned airports are not subject to local platting, zoning, and land use ordinances. The Airport Zoning Act, (AS 02.25) is not preempted by the general requirements of
AS

40.15.200

.
1996 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

Sec. 40.15.290.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 12 ch 40 SLA 1998.]